Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1620
Direct Primary Care Pilot Program; established.

The Direct Primary Care Pilot Program is established within the Nebraska State Insurance Program. The pilot program shall begin in fiscal year 2019-20 and continue through fiscal year 2022-23. Through the pilot program the Nebraska State Insurance Program shall include direct primary care health plans. Thereafter the department may continue to offer the direct primary care health plans.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 3.